src/noun-fao-morph.txt
LEXICON k-flt43
!+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM ;
!+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC ;
!+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLDAT ;
!+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLGEN ;

+N+Msc:fedr S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:fedr S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:fedr S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:fedr S-M-PLGEN ;


LEXICON k44 ! bróðir, stem is bróð
+N+Msc+Sg+Nom:ir DF-N-SGm ;
            :ur k44-obl ;

LEXICON k44-obl
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-NULL ;
k-flt44 ;

LEXICON k-flt44f
k-flt44 ;

LEXICON k-flt44
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-NULL ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^IUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^IUML S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k45 ! spónur
k45e ;
k-flt45 ;

LEXICON k45e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;

LEXICON k-flt45
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k46 ! fjørður ! XXX start her.
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^OEA S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k47 ! sonur
k47e ;
k-flt47 ;

LEXICON k47e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN-AR ;

LEXICON k-flt47
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^IUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k48 ! hamar
k48e ;
k-flt48 ;

LEXICON k48e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt48
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^UUML S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k49 ! verkur
k49e ;
k-flt49 ;

LEXICON k49e
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt49
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-PLNOM-IR ;
+N+Msc:%^JDEL S-M-PLACC-IR ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k50 ! skjøldur (non-poetic)
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S-M-SGGEN-AR ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:%^EPH%^OEA S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k51 ! luður
+N+Msc:ð S-M-SGNOM ;
+N+Msc:nn S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc:nn S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc:nn S-M-SGGEN ;
+N+Msc:nn S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc:nn S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc:nn S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc:nn S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k52 ! primus
k52e ;
k-flt52 ;

LEXICON k52e
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;

LEXICON k-flt52
+N+Msc: S-M-PLNOM ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-PLGEN ;

LEXICON k53 ! aðal
+N+Msc: S-M-SGNOM-NULL ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGACC ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGDAT ;
+N+Msc: S-M-SGGEN ;


! Feminines
! ----------

LEXICON kv1/2
kv1 ;
kv2 ;

LEXICON kv1/6f
kv1 ;
kv6 ;

LEXICON kv1 ! genta
kv1e ;
kv-flt1 ;

LEXICON kv1e
+N+Fem: W-F-SGNOM ;
+N+Fem: W-F-SGOBL ;

LEXICON kv-flt1
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv2/22
kv2 ;
kv22 ;


LEXICON kv2/6
kv2 ;
kv6 ;

LEXICON kv2/27
kv2 ;
kv27 ;

LEXICON kv2/3
kv2 ;
kv3 ;

LEXICON kv2e/17e
kv2e ;
kv17e ;

LEXICON kv2 ! bygd
kv2e ;
kv-flt2 ;

LEXICON kv-bd2e
kv2e ;

LEXICON kv2e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt2
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv3/2
kv3 ;
kv2 ;

LEXICON kv3/5
kv3 ;
kv5 ;

LEXICON kv3/7
kv3 ;
kv7 ;

LEXICON kv3 ! søgn
kv3e ;
kv-flt3 ;

LEXICON kv3e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt3 
+N+Fem:%^OEA F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:      F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv4 ! fonn
kv4e ;
kv-flt4 ;

LEXICON kv4e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OA S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt4
+N+Fem:%^OA F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem:     F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OA F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv5 ! øld
kv5e ;
kv-flt5 ;

LEXICON kv5e
+N+Fem:      S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt5
+N+Fem:      F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem:      F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv6/2
kv6 ;
kv2 ;

LEXICON kv6 ! ár
kv6e ;
kv-flt6 ;

LEXICON kv6e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt6
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv7/3
kv7 ;
kv3 ;

LEXICON kv7 ! vørr
kv7e ;
kv-flt7 ;

LEXICON kv7e
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt7
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv8 ! egg
kv8e ;
kv-flt8 ;

LEXICON kv8e
+N+Fem:%^JDEL S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt8
+N+Fem:       F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv9/2
kv9 ;
kv2 ;

LEXICON kv9 ! stong
kv9e ;
kv-flt9 ;

LEXICON kv9e
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OA   S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt9
+N+Fem:%^eIUML F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OA   F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv10 ! dorg
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv11 ! song
kv11e ;
kv-flt11 ;

LEXICON kv11e
+N+Fem:%^JDEL S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^JDEL S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^EIO  S-F-SGGEN ;


LEXICON kv-flt11
+N+Fem:%^EIO  F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem:%^EIO  F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EIO  F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv12 ! bók
kv12e ;
kv-flt12 ;

LEXICON kv12e 
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv12f
kv-flt12 ;

LEXICON kv-flt12 
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv13 ! mørk
kv13e ;
kv-flt13 ;

LEXICON kv13e
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt13
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-UR ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv14 ! nátt
kv14e ;
kv-flt14 ;

LEXICON kv14e
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt14
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-UR ; ! XXX one t, nætur
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv15 ! tonn
kv15e ;
kv-flt15 ;

LEXICON kv15e
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^OA  S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt15f
kv-flt15 ;

LEXICON kv-flt15
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-NULL ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^OEA  F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv16 ! mús
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:       S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-NULL ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:       F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv17 ! mastur
kv17e ;
kv-flt17 ;

LEXICON kv17e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt17
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv18/17
kv18 ;
kv17 ;

LEXICON kv18 ! brúður
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^RDEL S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv19 ! fjøður
kv19e ;
kv-flt19 ;

LEXICON kv19e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt19f
kv-flt19f ;

LEXICON kv-flt19
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^OEA F-PLNA-AR ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^OEA F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^EPH%^OEA F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv20 ! ær (only)
+N+Fem:ær S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem:ær S-F-SGGEN-NULL ;
+N+Fem:ær F-PLNA-NULL ;
+N+Fem:ó F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:á F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv21 ! gjógv
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv22 ! klógv
kv22e ;
kv-flt22 ;

LEXICON kv22e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt22
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv23 ! trúgv
kv23e ;
kv-flt23 ;

LEXICON kv23e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt23
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv24/2
kv24 ;
kv2 ;

LEXICON kv24/6
kv24 ;
kv6 ;

LEXICON kv24 ! kúgv
kv24e ;
kv-flt24 ;

LEXICON kv24e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt24f
kv-flt24 ;

LEXICON kv-flt24
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv25 ! gás
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv26 ! tá
kv26e ;
kv-flt26 ;

LEXICON kv26e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt26
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv27 ! rás
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;
+N+Fem: F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem: F-PLGEN ;


LEXICON kv28 ! dyr
! kv28e ;
kv-flt28 ;

!LEXICON kv28e ! no ex
!# ;

LEXICON kv-flt28
+N+Fem+Pl:%^IUML F-PLNA-NULL ;
+N+Fem+Pl: F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem+Pl: F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON kv29 ! móðir
+N+Fem+Sg:móð kv29e ;
+N+Fem+Pl:møð kv-flt29 ;


LEXICON kv29e 
+Nom:ir%> DF-N-SGf-S ;
+Acc:ur%> DF-A-SGf-S ;
+Dat:ur%> DF-D-SGf-S ;
+Gen:ur%> DF-G-SGf-S ;

LEXICON kv-flt29 
+Nom:ur%> DF-NA-PLf ;
+Acc:ur%> DF-NA-PLf ;
+Dat:r%>u DF-D-PL ;
+Gen:r%>a DF-G-PL ;

LEXICON kv30 ! dóttir
+N+Fem+Sg:dótt kv30e ;
+N+Fem+Pl:døt  kv-flt30 ;

LEXICON kv30e ! Remove for kv29e?
kv29e ;

LEXICON kv-flt30
kv-flt29 ;

LEXICON kv31 ! systir
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom:ir DF-N-SGf-S ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Acc:ur DF-A-SGf-S ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Dat:ur DF-D-SGf-S ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Gen:ur DF-G-SGf-S ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom:rar DF-NA-PLf ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Acc:rar DF-NA-PLf ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Dat:rum DF-D-PL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Gen:ra DF-G-PL ;

LEXICON kv32 ! mýri
kv32e ;
kv-flt32 ;

LEXICON kv32e
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom:i FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Acc:i FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Dat:i FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Gen:ar FINAL ;

LEXICON kv-flt32
+N+Fem+Pl+Nom:ar FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Acc:ar FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Dat:um FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Gen:a FINAL ;


LEXICON kv33 ! gleði
kv33e ;
kv-flt33 ;

LEXICON kv33e 
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: FINAL ;

LEXICON kv-flt33 
+N+Fem+Sg+Nom:r FINAL ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Acc:r FINAL ;

LEXICON kv34 ! kraft
kv34e;
kv-flt34 ;

LEXICON kv34e
+N+Fem: S-F-SGNAD ;
+N+Fem: S-F-SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv-flt34 
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLNA-IR ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLDAT ;
+N+Fem:%^IUML F-PLGEN ;

LEXICON h1 ! eyga
h1e ; !eyga
h-flt1 ;

LEXICON h1e
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a DF-NA-SGn-indef ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a DF-NA-SGn-def ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a DF-NA-SGn-indef ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a DF-NA-SGn-def ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>a DF-D-SGn ;
+N+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>a DF-G-SGn-a ;

LEXICON h-flt1
+N+Neu: N-PLNA-u-ur ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG-na ;

LEXICON h2 ! hjarta
              h1e ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLNA-u-ur ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLD ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLG-na ;

LEXICON h3/5
h3 ;
h5 ;

LEXICON h3/22
h3 ;
h22 ;

LEXICON h3 ! orð
 h3e ;
 h-flt3 ;

LEXICON h3e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt3f
h-flt3 ;

LEXICON h-flt3
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h4/5
h4 ;
h5 ;

LEXICON h4 ! boð
 h4e ;
 h-flt4 ;

LEXICON h4e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGG ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt4
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h5/3
h5 ;
h3 ;

LEXICON h5 ! barn
 h5e ;
 h-flt5 ;

LEXICON h5e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt5
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h6/4
h6 ;
h4 ;

LEXICON h6 ! lag
 h6e ;
 h-flt6 ;

LEXICON h6e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGG ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt6
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h7 ! bræv
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h8 ! land
 h8e ;
 h-flt8 ;

LEXICON h8e ! land
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt8 ! land
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h9/10
h9 ;
h10 ;

LEXICON h9 ! blikk
h9e ;
h-flt9 ;

LEXICON h9e 
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt9
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h10 ! fall
 h10e ;
 h-flt10 ;

LEXICON h10e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt10
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;


LEXICON h11e/22f
h11e ;
h-flt22 ;

LEXICON h11 ! hús
h11e ;
h-flt11 ;

LEXICON h11e
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt11
+N+Neu: N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu: N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;

LEXICON h12 ! glas
h12e ;
h-flt12 ;

LEXICON h12e 
+N+Neu: S-N-SGNA ;
+N+Neu: S-N-SGDG-is ;

LEXICON h-flt12
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLNA ;
+N+Neu:%^UUML N-PLD ;
+N+Neu: N-PLG ;
